Massachusetts, session 194th, H3258.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by section 3 of
chapter 50 of the acts of 2023, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5O the
following new section:-
Section 5P. With respect to each parcel of real property classified as Class One,
residential, in each city or town certified by the commissioner to be assessing all property at its
full and fair cash valuation, and at the option of the board of selectmen or mayor, with the
approval of the city council or local legislative body, may require that for a person who has
reached his sixty-fifth birthday prior to the fiscal year for which the property is assessed and
occupied by said person as his domicile, or of a person who owns the same jointly with his
spouse, that the assessed tax value of such real property may not increase more than a maximum
of two and one-half per cent over the previous year’s tax assessment. Such assessment under this
section shall be inclusive of any special local tax overrides or increases for the fiscal year. In
of 2

order to qualify for this section the taxpayer must have been domiciled in the commonwealth for
the preceding ten years and has so owned and occupied such real property in the commonwealth
for five years, prior to the assessment of taxes in the current tax year.
of 2